Mississippi, session 2026, SB3124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-7-22.43, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-7-22.43.  (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Pregnancy Resource Act." (2)  For the purposes of this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Department" means the Department of Revenue. (b)  "Eligible charitable organization" means an organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is a pregnancy resource center or crisis pregnancy center. To be considered an "eligible charitable organization" a pregnancy resource center or crisis pregnancy center must meet the following criteria: (i) Certify that no more than twenty percent (20%) of the contributions received under this section will be spent on administrative purposes; (ii) File annually with the Secretary of State the organization's publicly available Internal Revenue Service filings * * *.; (iii) Maintain in this state a physical office, clinic, or maternity home and regularly answer a dedicated phone line; (iv) Exclusively offer services or direct financial assistance, with the express purposes of providing assistance to carry a pregnancy to term or to encourage parenting, marriage, or adoption as an alternative to abortion; (v) Utilize trained and licensed medical professionals to perform any available medical procedures; and (vi) Not make referrals or facilitate in any way any abortion as defined by Section 41-41-45(1) or refer for or facilitate use of any abortion inducing drug as defined by Section 41-41-105. (3)  (a)  For calendar years through 2025, the tax credit authorized in this section shall be available only to a taxpayer who is a business enterprise engaged in commercial, industrial or professional activities and operating as a corporation, limited liability company, partnership or sole proprietorship; thereafter, the tax credit authorized in this section shall also be available to taxpayers that are not business enterprises.  Except as otherwise provided in this section, a credit is allowed against the taxes imposed by Sections 27-7-5, 27-15-103, 27-15-109 and 27-15-123, for voluntary cash contributions made by a taxpayer during the taxable year to an eligible charitable organization.  For calendar year 2022, for a taxpayer that is not operating as a corporation, a credit is also allowed against ad valorem taxes assessed and levied on real property for voluntary cash contributions made by the taxpayer during the taxable year to an eligible charitable organization. From and after January 1, 2023, a credit is also allowed against ad valorem taxes assessed and levied on real property for voluntary cash contributions made by a taxpayer during the taxable year to an eligible charitable organization.  The amount of credit that may be utilized by a taxpayer in a taxable year shall be limited to (i) an amount not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the total tax liability of the taxpayer for the taxes imposed by such sections of law and (ii) an amount not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the total tax liability of the taxpayer for ad valorem taxes assessed and levied on real property.  Any tax credit claimed under this section but not used in any taxable year may be carried forward for five (5) consecutive years from the close of the tax year in which the credits were earned. (b)  A contribution for which a credit is claimed under this section may not be used as a deduction by the taxpayer for state income tax purposes. (4)  Taxpayers taking a credit authorized by this section shall provide the name of the eligible charitable organization and the amount of the contribution to the department on forms provided by the department. (5)  An eligible charitable organization shall provide the department with a written certification that it meets all criteria to be considered an eligible charitable organization.  The organization shall also notify the department of any changes that may affect eligibility under this section. (6)  The eligible charitable organization's written certification must be signed by an officer of the organization under penalty of perjury.  The written certification shall include the following: (a)  Verification of the organization's status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; (b)  A statement that the organization does not provide, pay for, prescribe, distribute, refer for, promote or provide coverage of * * * abortions any abortion as defined by Section 41-41-45(1) or any abortion-inducing drug as defined by Section 41-41-105, and does not financially support or affiliate with any other entity that provides, pays for, prescribes, distributes, refers for, promotes or provides coverage of * * * abortions any abortion; (c)  A statement that the organization: (i)  In the prior fiscal year, did not receive more than fifty percent (50%) of its total annual revenue from a federal, state, or local governmental agency, either directly or as a contractor of such an agency; and (ii)  In the prior fiscal year, expended seventy percent (70%) of any contributions received under this section to serve clients who are full-time or part-time residents of this state; and ( * * *cd)  Any other information that the department requires to administer this section. (7)  The department shall review each written certification and determine whether the organization meets all the criteria to be considered an eligible charitable organization and notify the organization of its determination.  The department may also periodically request recertification from the organization.  The department shall compile and make available to the public a list of eligible charitable organizations. (8)  Tax credits authorized by this section that are earned by a partnership, limited liability company, S corporation or other similar pass-through entity, shall be allocated among all partners, members or shareholders, respectively, either in proportion to their ownership interest in such entity or as the partners, members or shareholders mutually agree as provided in an executed document. (9) (a)  A taxpayer shall apply for credits with the department on forms prescribed by the department.  In the application the taxpayer shall certify to the department the dollar amount of the contributions made or to be made during the calendar year.  Within thirty (30) days after the receipt of an application, the department shall allocate credits based on the dollar amount of contributions as certified in the application.  However, if the department cannot allocate the full amount of credits certified in the application due to the limit on the aggregate amount of credits that may be awarded under this section in a calendar year, the department shall so notify the applicant within thirty (30) days with the amount of credits, if any, that may be allocated to the applicant in the calendar year.  Once the department has allocated credits to a taxpayer, if the contribution for which a credit is allocated has not been made as of the date of the allocation, then the contribution must be made not later than sixty (60) days from the date of the allocation.  If the contribution is not made within such time period, the allocation shall be cancelled and returned to the department for reallocation. Upon final documentation of the contributions, if the actual dollar amount of the contributions is lower than the amount estimated, the department shall adjust the tax credit allowed under this section. (b) For the purposes of using a tax credit against ad valorem taxes assessed and levied on real property, a taxpayer shall present to the appropriate tax collector the tax credit documentation provided to the taxpayer by the Department of Revenue, and the tax collector shall apply the tax credit against such ad valorem taxes.  The tax collector shall forward the tax credit documentation to the Department of Revenue along with the amount of the tax credit applied against ad valorem taxes, and the department shall disburse funds to the tax collector for the amount of the tax credit applied against ad valorem taxes.  Such payments by the Department of Revenue shall be made from current tax collections. (10)  The aggregate amount of tax credits that may be allocated by the department under this section during a calendar year shall not exceed Three Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($3,500,000.00).  However, for calendar year 2023, and for each calendar year thereafter, the aggregate amount of tax credits that may be allocated by the department under this section during a calendar year shall not exceed Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00).  For credits allocated during a calendar year for contributions to eligible charitable organizations, no more than twenty-five percent (25%) of such credits may be allocated for contributions to a single eligible charitable organization; however, credits not allocated before June 1, may be allocated without regard to such restriction for the same calendar year. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after January 1, 2026.